data/grammar/fst/lexicon.lexc
LEXICON NounEndings

! "ngangnit"/tn-abl-s-4d (dual ablative, "his/her/their two X's"):
! "katimajingannit" is gold's only tn-abl-s-4d example, and its own
! surface span is "ngannit" -- identical to the already-implemented
! "ngannit"/tn-abl-s-4p (PLURAL) spelling, not the canonical "ngangnit"
! Endings_noun.csv's own V-form gives (no reduced candidate documented
! there at all). A real dual/plural spelling homograph, not a bug --
! same "wire the attested literal, let the input string pick" treatment
! as every other spelling variant this session, just this once the
! variant happens to coincide with a DIFFERENT tag's own spelling.
++ngangnit+tn-abl-s-4d:ngannit # ;

! "nganit"/tn-abl-s-4s's own SECOND q-context candidate: Endings_noun.csv
! gives q-form "nganit anit" (2 space-separated candidates), both
! action1 Suppression -- the bulk generator only ever wires the FIRST
! ("SUPPRnganit", already in endings-generated.lexc), since the second
! candidate's own action2 ("s") isn't a code generate_affixes.py
! understands yet (unlike "decap", the only action2 value currently
! handled). "aippaanit" needs this second candidate specifically:
! "aippaq"+SUPPR(deletes the q)+"anit" = "aippaanit", confirmed directly
! via hfst-lookup before wiring -- "anit" is already the CSV's own
! literal (not derived by a new rule), so just needs the same SUPPR
! marker action1 already calls for.

! "k"/tn-nom-d (dual nominative): "ministaa"/"iksivautaa"/"ajjaqsijii"/
! etc. Endings_noun.csv's V-context action pair is VowelLengthening+
! Cancellation -- a genuinely NEW mechanism, not a marker-scoped rewrite
! of the PRECEDING stem (like NASAL/VOICE) but a COPY of whatever vowel
! immediately precedes, with the ending's own canonical "k" contributing
! NOTHING else to the surface at all ("minista"+"a"(doubled)="ministaa",
! not "minista"+"a"+"k"). New TNNOMD marker: duplicates a/i/u (whichever
! immediately precedes it), phonology.xfscript. t/k/q-context (Insertion
! "i" / Suppression+VowelLengthening) not attempted: every gold word in
! this cluster is vowel-final by the time "k" attaches.
++k+tn-nom-d:TNNOMD # ;

! "ptingni"/tn-loc-s-1d (dual locative): Endings_noun.csv flags this
! row's V-context as Neutral (no change), but that's misleading -- CSV
! V/t/k/q columns only ever describe what happens based on the PRECEDING
! stem, and every gold example (all vowel-final roots: arraagu/kinguni/
! nuna/sivuni) shows the SAME internal reduction regardless: "ptingni" ->
! "ttinni" (p assimilates to its own following t, same general p->t rule
! as "gapta" below; "ng"->"n" simplifies too). Unconditional on preceding
! context, so implemented as a plain literal surface text, same
! "canonical citation form differs from the always-used surface form"
! shape as "ralaaq" in NnSuffixes below -- no marker, no guessed trigger
! condition. Also needed a SUPPR-prefixed variant for when the
! immediately preceding morpheme has its own trailing consonant to shed
! (needed for "nunalittinni" via lik/1nn).
++ptingni+tn-loc-s-1d:ttinni # ;
++ptingni+tn-loc-s-1d:SUPPRttinni # ;

! The same "ptingni"->"ttinni" reduction (p->t, ng->n) applies to this
! ending's plural-1p siblings too (tn-loc-p-1p/tn-acc-p-1p/tn-dat-p-1p,
! needed by "uva"/1rpr, a bulk-generated Pronouns.csv "rpr"-type root --
! see generate_roots.py's own comment on load_pronouns_csv) --
! Endings_noun.csv's own literal text for those rows is the unprocessed
! "ptingni"/"ptingnik"/"ptingnut" (bulk-generated as-is in
! endings-generated.lexc, harmless but never matches any real gold
! surface), so the corrected spelling is hand-added here rather than
! guessing at a general rule from a single root family.
++ptingni+tn-loc-p-1p:ttinni # ;
++ptingnik+tn-acc-p-1p:ttinnik # ;
++ptingnut+tn-dat-p-1p:ttinnut # ;


! "it"/tn-nom-p: {arna:arnaq/1n}{it:it/tn-nom-p} = "arnait" and
! {iglu:iglu/1n}{it:it/tn-nom-p} = "igluit". Endings_noun.csv's "it" row
! has TWO actions per context (action1, action2): action1 is the familiar
! Suppression/Neutral; action2 is Selfdecapitation (Action.kt: strips the
! affix's OWN first letter, "it"->"t"), firing only when the stem left
! behind by action1 would end in two vowels, to avoid a 3-vowel run --
! forced into the open by "arraagutamaat" (see "tamaaq"/1nn's comment in
! NnSuffixes below). New DECAP marker: SUPPR still fires first (deletes
! a preceding q/k/t if present), then a rule deletes "it"'s own leading
! "i" specifically when the segment immediately before the marker is two
! vowels, then the marker itself is dropped -- verified in isolation (a
! toy "...aaqSUPPRDECAPit" string through analogous rules) before
! touching this entry. Correct for the V-context ("iglu", no deletion,
! and "iglu" itself never ends in two vowels so decap stays inert) and
! the q-context ("arnaq"/"arraagutamaaq") alike. NOT yet correct for a
! t-final root: this ending's own t-context action is Neutral, not
! Suppression, but the existing SUPPR rule generalizes deletion across
! q/k/t uniformly -- so a t-final root reaching this entry would still
! wrongly lose its final t. Deferred rather than guessed at: fix when a
! gold-standard word actually needs the t-context.
! Also has an UNCONDITIONAL "t"-only spelling, own leading "i" dropped
! regardless of how many vowels precede -- not the same thing as DECAP
! (which only strips it when exactly two vowels precede): gold attests
! "katimajiit" (the DECAP-inert full spelling, one vowel precedes,
! matching the documented behavior above) and "katimajit" (the
! reduced spelling) as separate entries for the IDENTICAL
! decomposition, so this is genuine free variation on top of the
! documented DECAP mechanism, not a replacement for it. Found by
! testing whether "combination mismatch" gold words sharing an
! "it"/tn-nom-p tail might be free-variant spellings rather than a
! deeper phonology gap -- confirmed for several at once
! ("piliriaksat"/"piqujaksat"/"uqausiksat", all ksaq/1nn+it chains;
! "pigiaqtitat", a jaq/1vn+it chain), not just "katimajit".
! "SUPPRt": the ending's own LEADING "i" dropped AND a preceding
! suffix's final consonant deleted -- "katimajit", and the ksaq/1nn+it /
! jaq/1vn+it chains "piliriaksat"/"piqujaksat"/"uqausiksat"/
! "pigiaqtitat"/"maligaliuqtit". LENIENT (word-final consonant deletion)
! does NOT reach this ("i" is not word-final and not a consonant), and
! the FST has no unconditional "drop the ending's leading vowel"
! mechanism (DECAP only fires after exactly two vowels) -- so this stays
! a hand entry. The "i"-only free variant (own trailing "t" dropped,
! "titiraqtii" for "...ji+it") is now covered by LENIENT and was
! removed.
++it+tn-nom-p:SUPPRt # ;

! "ngit"/tn-nom-p-4s: "akingit" = {aki:aki/1n}{ngit:ngit/tn-nom-p-4s}
! (V-context, plain) and "atingit" = {ati:atiq/1n}{ngit:ngit/tn-nom-p-4s}
! (q-context, root's final q deleted). V-form=ngit/Neutral,
! k/q-form=ngit/Suppression -- all single candidate, genuine rule, reuses
! SUPPR unchanged. t-context has two candidates (Insertion "i" vs
! Suppression, no algorithmic disambiguator) -- deferred, same policy as
! every such case.

! The "ngi"-only free variant (own trailing "t" dropped, "asingi" for
! "asi+ngit") is now covered by LENIENT and was removed.

! "nut"/tn-dat-p: same shared NounEndings hub deliberately serves "it"
! (reached from bare noun roots via NounContinuations) and "nut" (reached
! from NnSuffixes-derived stems like "kkut"): "it" and "nut" should
! always be the same reachable set, since ANY noun-like stem can take ANY
! tn-ending -- e.g. "tuinnaq"/1nn (NnSuffixes) needs to reach "it" too.
! Gained the same default-branch NASAL/SUPPR pair as the other Lever A
! endings (see generate_affixes.py's "Lever A" investigation note):
! "surusirnut" (root "surusiq", Nasalization: q->r) versus
! "nutaanut"/"ukiunut" (roots "nutaaq"/"ukiuq", Suppression: q simply
! deleted) -- same root-dependent split, both real. nut's own TRIGGER
! branch (Suppression when preceded specifically by juq/1vn/ksaq/1nn/
! jaq/3vn) is wired in NounEndingsAfterQTriggerSuffix below, confirmed
! via "ajjigiinngittunut".

! The "nu"-only free variant of "nut" (own trailing "t" dropped,
! "inunnut"/"inunnu") is now covered by LENIENT and was removed. The
! doubled "n" in "inuk"+"nut" -> "inunnut" still comes from the general
! k->n assimilation rule in phonology.xfscript firing on the preceding
! root's own final k (SUPPR would delete that k before assimilation
! could double it).

! "up"/tn-gen-s k/q-context (Suppression, deletes a preceding q/k/t):
! now generated as "SUPPRDECAPup" (DECAP is inert after a single-vowel
! stem, so it equals the old hand "SUPPRup" for every gold word -- 0
! change on removal).

! "SUPPRp": "up"'s own LEADING "u" dropped, merging with a preceding
! vowel ("iksivautaup"/"iksivautap"; also "nunatsiap"/"nunattiap").
! Not reachable via LENIENT (leading vowel, not word-final consonant)
! and no unconditional leading-vowel-drop mechanism -- stays a hand
! entry, same shape as "it"/tn-nom-p's "SUPPRt" above. The "u"-only
! free variant (own trailing "p" dropped, "ministaup"/"ministau") is
! now covered by LENIENT and was removed.
++up+tn-gen-s:SUPPRp # ;

! The "tigu"-only free variant of "tigut" (own trailing "t" dropped,
! "tusaajitigut"/"tusaajitigu") is now covered by LENIENT and was
! removed, along with its AfterViaCaseEnding continuation.


! ngagut/ngani/nganut/nganik + nga /tn-*-s-4s: Endings_noun.csv gives
! each of these a SECOND V-context candidate ("agut"/"ani"/"anut"/
! "anik"/"a", each missing its own leading "ng") tagged action1=Neutral
! action2=Suppression. generate_affixes.py now emits the plain reduced
! literal for that action pair (see its candidates_for_context comment on
! the "nga a" family) -- so these no longer need a hand entry. The choice
! between full and reduced is genuinely root-specific, not CSV-derivable
! (e.g. "sivuni" attests both "sivuniani" and "sivuningani"): both stay
! wired as parallel candidates. The SUPPR-prefixed q-final variants
! ("qitiq" -> "qitingani") come from the same row's k/q columns and were
! already generated.

! "amittuq" = {amit:amit/1v}{tuq:juq/1vn} -- verb root + derivational
! (verb-to-noun) suffix whose canonical form "juq" surfaces as "tuq"
! after a t/k/q-final stem (rule in phonology.xfscript).
